Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
In General

§ 55-5-1.
Declaration of emergency.

The urgent need for bridges over and across the rivers and waters within and bordering this state, and the need on the part of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi for the expenditure of such funds as may be made available by Sections 55-5-1 through 55-5-17 makes the enactment of said sections into law necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, safety, convenience and welfare of the inhabitants of this state and requires the necessity that said sections shall take effect and be in force from and after their passage and approval.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-3.
Construction.

Sections 55-5-1 through 55-5-17, being necessary for and to secure the public health, safety, convenience and welfare of municipalities, counties and other political subdivisions of the State of Mississippi, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5973; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-5.
Conveyances by counties of rights-of-way and easements for construction of roadways and parkways by federal government; eminent domain; powers of federal government as to national roadways or parkways generally.

The board of supervisors of any county within the State of Mississippi through which or adjoining which the United States government or any of its agencies desires to construct a roadway or a roadway and parkway in connection therewith, shall have full power to donate such rights of way, together with scenic easements of such additional lands as may be required by the United States government, for the purpose of constructing such roadway or roadway and parkway. Any and all counties in the State of Mississippi are authorized to receive by donation, gift, will or purchase with county funds, any and all necessary lands, rights of way or scenic easements, and after the acquisition of such lands, rights of way or scenic easements may, by resolution or deed or other authorization of the board of supervisors of such county, convey same to the United States or to such subordinate agency of the United States as may be required for the establishment of such roadway or roadway and parkway.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi is hereby expressly vested with the power of eminent domain to condemn for public use as a public park and for scenic easement all lands adjoining such public park or parkway and for road or roadways and to acquire title to all or any part of the lands which such board of supervisors may deem necessary for the purposes of complying with the requirements of the United States government in the establishment of any national roadway or roadway and parkway through the State of Mississippi. Such right of condemnation shall include the right to condemn houses, outbuildings, orchards, yards, gardens and other improvements on such lands. Said board of supervisors is authorized to acquire all or any right, title or interest in and to all or any part of such lands and the improvements thereon by the right of eminent domain in condemnation proceedings or by gift, devise, purchase or any other lawful means for the transfer of title. Such condemnation proceedings shall be carried out and executed as are condemnation proceedings by the highway department of the State of Mississippi as authorized under the laws of the State of Mississippi.

The United States government, or any of its subsidiary agencies, shall have complete control and supervision, severally or in connection with any county or counties in the State of Mississippi or with the highway department of the State of Mississippi, with full power and authority to locate, relocate, widen, alter, change, straighten, construct or reconstruct roads or rights of way, parkways or lands covered by scenic easements on any federal parkway, highway or trace being constructed by the United States government or any of its subsidiary subdivisions or severally or jointly with any county or counties in the State of Mississippi or with the state highway department of the State of Mississippi and shall have full and complete authority for the making of all contracts, surveys, plans and specifications and estimates for the location, laying out, widening, straightening, altering, changing, constructing, reconstructing and maintaining and securing rights of way therefor of any and all such highways, parkways, and scenic easements and shall further have the right to authorize its employees and agents to enter upon property for such purposes. The said United States government severally and any county or counties in the State of Mississippi and the said highway department, either jointly or severally, is further authorized and empowered to obtain and pay for rights of way to such width and extent as may be necessary to meet the requirement of the United States government for the construction and building of new parkway or roadway or scenic highway in the State of Mississippi. Such political authorities, either jointly or severally shall have the right to condemn or acquire by gift or purchase lands necessary for the building and maintenance of said roadway, parkway or trace.

In event that said political authority or authorities so acting, either jointly or severally, shall be unable to agree with the owners of land necessary for widening any existing public highways which shall be used as a part of said national roadway or parkway or for the building of said roadway or parkway or for the laying out of any public highway or parkway in connection therewith or changing the route of an existing public highway, then the said political authority or authorities, either jointly or severally, aforesaid, shall be authorized to condemn any land needed for any of said purposes. The proceedings to acquire such lands by condemnation shall be in conformity with the statute on the subject of eminent domain under the laws of the State of Mississippi, the power of eminent domain being hereby expressly conferred upon said political subdivision or authorities for that purpose.

Such proceedings shall take precedence over all other causes not involving the public interest in all courts and shall be given preference to the end that construction and reconstructions of highways and parkways may not be unreasonably delayed, but the same may be fully expedited. The amount of such compensation and damages, if any, awarded to the owner in such proceedings shall be paid by the respective counties in which the lands obtained for such highway or parkway may be located unless funds are otherwise provided by the State of Mississippi for the acquisition of such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5964, 5965; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-7.
Conveyances of roads or rights-of-way by Highway Commission.

The State Highway Commission of the State of Mississippi is hereby fully authorized to convey and set over unto the United States government, or any of its subsidiary departments when approved by the Governor of the State of Mississippi, any and all rights of way or roads which it may own or possess or have authority over, conveying same exclusively to the United States government or conveying joint control thereof to the United States government for the purpose of aiding in the location, building, construction and maintenance of a national highway or parkway in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5967; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-9.
Conveyances by Governor; grant of rights-of-way, easements, etc., in sixteenth section lands.

The Governor of the State of Mississippi is further authorized to convey to the United States or any of its subsidiary agencies any and all lands owned by the State of Mississippi which have been acquired by tax sale, donation, or gift. The said State of Mississippi and the said boards of supervisors of the county where said parkway is located are fully authorized and empowered to give and grant any and all rights of way, parkway rights or scenic easements in, over and through any sixteenth section lands or lands in lieu of sixteenth section lands, making any and all necessary conveyances thereto which may be required by the United States government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5969; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-11.
Execution of conveyances and deeds.

The board of supervisors and the State of Mississippi, acting by and through its Governor, are fully authorized and vested with power to execute any lawful conveyance or conveyances, deed or deeds which said board of supervisors or such governor may deem proper and necessary for the execution of any contract or contracts under authority of Sections 55-5-1 through 55-5-17. Any deed or deeds or conveyance or conveyances, when executed by the board of supervisors shall be executed in the name of the county, and when executed by the Governor shall be executed in the name of the State of Mississippi. Such deed when executed by the board of supervisors shall be attested by the chancery clerk, and when executed by the governor shall be attested by the secretary of state. Such deeds or instruments shall be sealed with the respective seals of the respective authorities and no other warrant or authority shall be required for the conveyance of such right, title or interest or for the registration of any of such instruments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5968; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-13.
Protection of adjacent property.

The authorities constructing such highway, parkway, or roadway under the authority as is provided in Sections 55-5-1 through 55-5-17 shall use diligence to protect growing crops and pastures, and to prevent damage to any property not taken. So far as possible, all rights of way for roadways and parkways purposes and scenic easements purposes shall be acquired or contracted for before any route is definitely located.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5966; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-15.
Limitation of size of national roadway or parkway.

Such national roadway or parkway shall not exceed in area as an average throughout its length in the State of Mississippi more than one hundred (100) acres to the mile of such roadway or parkway, and in addition thereto not in excess of fifty (50) acres to the mile of said national roadway or parkway of scenic easement rights.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5971; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.

§ 55-5-17.
Acquisition of lands by United States; reservations of rights.

The United States of America is authorized to acquire by deed or conveyance, gift, will or otherwise lands for the purpose of roadways and parkways as set forth in Sections 55-5-1 through 55-5-17, but this consent is given upon condition that the State of Mississippi shall retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over such lands so far that civil process in all cases and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the State of Mississippi against any person charged with the commission of any crime, without or within said jurisdiction, may be executed thereon in like manner as if this consent had not been given. Power is hereby conferred on the Congress of the United States to pass such laws as it may deem necessary for the acquisition of the said lands and for their incorporation in national roadways, parkways or national parks, and to pass such laws and make or provide for the making of such rules and regulations, of both civil and criminal nature, and to provide punishment therefor as in its judgment may be necessary for the management, control and protection of such lands as may be acquired by the United States under the provisions of the aforesaid sections, including such lands as are acquired not only for highway and parkway and park purposes but also those lands over which scenic easements are acquired for such purposes. Nevertheless, such jurisdiction shall not vest in the United States of America unless and until it, through the proper officer or officers, notifies the governor and, through him, the State of Mississippi that the United States of America assumes concurrent police jurisdiction over the land or lands thus deeded and conveyed. There is saved to the State of Mississippi the right to tax sales of gasoline and other motor vehicle fuels and oils for use in motor vehicles and to tax persons and corporations, their franchises and properties, on all land or lands deeded or conveyed as aforesaid. There is saved to persons residing in or on any of the land or lands deeded or conveyed as aforesaid, the right to vote at all elections within the county in which said land or lands are located, upon like terms and conditions and to the same extent as they would be entitled to vote in such county had not such lands been deeded or conveyed as aforesaid to the United States of America.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5970; Laws, 1935, ch. 52.